North Carolina, session 2025, HB289.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 17C-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17C-3. North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission established; members; terms; vacancies.
(a) There is established the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission, hereinafter called "the Commission." The Commission shall be
composed of 35 36 members as follows:
…
(4) At-large Groups. – One individual representing and appointed by each of the
following organizations: one mayor selected by the League of Municipalities;
one law-enforcement training officer selected by the North Carolina
Law-Enforcement Training Officers' Association; one criminal justice
professional selected by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Association; one
sworn law-enforcement officer selected by the North State Law-Enforcement
Officers' Association; one member selected by the North Carolina
Law-Enforcement Women's Association; and one District Attorney selected
by the North Carolina Association of District Attorneys.Attorneys; and one
full-time sworn law-enforcement officer selected by the North Carolina Police
Benevolent Association.
…."
SECTION 2. As enacted by Section 1 of this act, the initial term of office for the
member selected by the North Carolina Police Benevolent Association shall begin on July 1,
2025, and shall expire on June 30, 2028. Consistent with G.S. 17C-3(b), subsequent appointees
to these positions shall be appointed for a term of three years, but notwithstanding the
appointment for a term of three years, the members shall serve at the will of the appointing
authority.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H289-v-1*